Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the Washington state flag often faces criticism for its poor design and lack of relevance to the state's identity. The flag features a detailed portrait of George Washington, making it overly complex and difficult to reproduce which is a violation of key flag design principles that prioritize simplicity. Additionally, while George Washington is an important national figure, he has limited historical connection to the state itself. This makes his image less meaningful as a symbol for the state.The legislature further finds that the flag fails in other ways aesthetically. It uses too many colors, and its design is essentially a seal on a green background with text. This is widely regarded as an outdated and uninspired approach to flag design. As one of 28 state flags in the United States that showcase a seal on a solid color, Washington's flag lacks distinctiveness and fails to capture the unique character of the state. The current flag, though historically significant, does not resonate with the state's evolving identity. The legislature intends to create the Washington state flag redesign committee that will oversee the process to design and adopt a state flag that symbolizes unity and represents the unique character of the state.This section expires January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) The Washington state flag redesign committee is established to oversee the process of designing and adopting a new state flag design that better reflects the diversity and values of all Washingtonians. The committee must approve and adopt one design in accordance with this section by July 1, 2028, that will be the design submitted to the voters under RCW 1.20.010(3).(2) Membership of the committee includes:(a) The director of the Washington state arts commission, or the director's designee, who shall serve as the chair of the committee;(b) Two legislators, one each from the minority and majority caucuses in the senate, appointed by the secretary of the senate;(c) Two legislators, one each from the minority and majority caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the chief clerk of the house of representatives;(d) The secretary of state or the secretary's designee;(e) One historian, appointed by the Washington state historical society;(f) Two designers, appointed by the Washington arts commission;(g) Two cultural leaders, appointed by the Washington arts commission;(h) Four tribal representatives, appointed by the affiliated tribes of northwest Indians; and(i) Four citizen representatives from different regions of the state, appointed by the governor.(3) Administrative support for the committee is provided by the Washington arts commission.(4) The committee must:(a) Develop and adopt a new design for the official state flag that accurately and respectfully reflects Washington's shared history, resources, and diverse cultural communities;(b) Solicit public feedback and suggestions to inform its work, by: Participating in outreach to schools, community organizations, and tribes; hosting public forums, virtual discussions, and online surveys to ensure broad participation; and otherwise encouraging the public to submit designs;(c) Review the submitted designs with an eye for creativity, historical relevance, and the ability to represent the state's diverse population and landscapes;(d) Select no more than five designs to move to the final round of public feedback;(e) Adopt, by unanimous vote, the new design that will be included on the ballot of the next general election in accordance with RCW 1.20.010; and(f) By August 1, 2028, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, submit a report to the legislature and governor that includes:(i) The design of the new flag;(ii) A revised description of the flag to replace the description under RCW 1.20.010;(iii) A description of the symbols and other meanings incorporated in the design; and(iv) Details on the next steps in the process to adopt the new design, including legislation needed to place the new design on the ballot at the next general election in accordance with RCW 1.20.010.(5) The committee may contract with vexillologists and other persons who have either technical or artistic skill in flag construction and design to assist in the work of the committee.(6) This section expires January 1, 2029.Sec. 3. RCW 1.20.010 and 2011 c 336 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The official flag of the state of Washington shall be of dark green silk or bunting and shall bear in its center a reproduction of the seal of the state of Washington embroidered, printed, painted or stamped thereon. The edges of the flag may, or may not, be fringed. If a fringe is used the same shall be of gold or yellow color of the same shade as the seal. The dimensions of the flag may vary.(2) The secretary of state is authorized to provide the state flag to units of the armed forces, without charge therefor, as in his or her discretion he or she deems entitled thereto. The secretary of state is further authorized to sell the state flag to any citizen at a price to be determined by the secretary of state.(3) The official flag of the state of Washington may not be redesigned without conducting a referendum asking voters whether the state should adopt the proposed new design or keep the current design.--- END ---